District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.01a

Comprehensive applicability to employees and public officials.

This chapter and the Code of Conduct shall apply to all employees and public officials serving the District of Columbia, its instrumentalities, subordinate and independent agencies, the Council of the District of Columbia, boards and commissions, and Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, but excluding the courts.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 201a
as added July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-122, § 2(b), 61 DCR 5688
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Code of Conduct and BEGA Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-323, Apr. 28, 2014, 61 DCR 4681).